Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1350.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a subclause to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920 (xx.1) Conduct prohibited under section 9.5.* * *Section 2. Section 3 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 3. Unlawful Acts or Practices; Exclusions.--* * *(d) The Attorney General shall:(1) During the period beginning July 1, 2027, and ending December 31, 2027, and, prior to initiating an action for a violation of section 9.5, issue a notice of violation to the covered entity or processor if the Attorney General determines that a cure is possible. If the covered entity or processor fails to cure the violation within sixty days of receipt of the notice of violation, the Attorney General may initiate an action under this section.(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, in determining whether to grant a covered entity or processor the opportunity to cure an alleged violation under clause (1), consider all of the following:(i) The number of violations.(ii) The size and complexity of the covered entity or processor.(iii) The nature and extent of the processing activities of the covered entity or processor.(iv) The substantial likelihood of injury to the public.(v) The safety of persons or property.(vi) Whether the alleged violation was likely caused by human or technical error.(e) Nothing in subsection (d) shall be construed as providing the basis for a private right of action for a violation of the provisions of this act.20260SB1350PN1777 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 9.5. Conduct Relating to Reproductive Health Data and Sexual Health Data.--(a) A covered entity or processor may not collect or process reproductive health data or sexual health data unless the covered entity or processor:(1) provides the consumer whose reproductive health data or sexual health data is being collected with a copy of the covered entity or processor's privacy policy;(2) obtains consent from the consumer to collect or process the consumer's reproductive health data or sexual health data; and(3) collects or processes the reproductive health data or sexual health data permitted under subsection (b).(b) A covered entity or processor may collect or process reproductive health data or sexual health data only to:(1) Provide a product, service or service feature to the consumer to whom the reproductive health data or sexual health data pertains when that consumer requested the product, service or service feature by subscribing to, creating an account with or otherwise contracting with the covered entity or processor.(2) Initiate, manage, execute or complete a financial or commercial transaction or to fulfill an order for a specific product or service requested by a consumer to whom the reproductive health data or sexual health data pertains, including associated routine administrative, operational and account servicing activity such as billing, shipping, storage and accounting.(3) Comply with an obligation under Federal or State law.(4) Protect public safety or public health.(c) A covered entity or processor shall provide on the 20260SB1350PN1777 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 covered entity or processor's publicly accessible Internet website a clear and conspicuous method that enables a consumer to request access to and deletion of the consumer's reproductive health data and sexual health data.(d) A covered entity or processor may not:(1) Collect more precise or retain reproductive health data and sexual health data than is necessary to perform a purpose described in subsection (a).(2) Derive from reproductive health data or sexual health data any information that is not necessary to perform a purpose described in subsection (a).(3) Disclose, cause to disclose, assist with the disclosure of or facilitate the disclosure of a consumer's reproductive health data or sexual health data to a third party, including when the data is part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or other transaction or a proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or other transaction, unless the disclosure is:(i) necessary to perform a purpose described under subsection (a);(ii) performed with valid consent obtained from the consumer to whom the reproductive health data or sexual health data pertains; and(iii) if the third party is Federal, State or local law enforcement:(A) served to the covered entity or processor with a valid warrant or establishes the existence of an exigent circumstance;(B) disclosed by a mandate under Federal or State law; or(C) disclosed at the request of the consumer to whom the reproductive health data pertains.(e) Beginning June 30, 2027, a covered entity or processor 20260SB1350PN1777 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may not sell or offer to sell reproductive health data or sexual health data unless the covered entity or process obtains valid consent in accordance with subsection (f) from the consumer to whom the reproductive health data or sexual health data pertains.(f) Consent to collect, sell or offer to sell reproductive health data or sexual health data under subsection (e) must be in writing, in plain language and contain all of the following to be valid:(1) The specific reproductive health data or sexual health data pertaining to the consumer that the covered entity or processor intends to sell.(2) The name and contact information of the covered entity or processor collecting and selling the reproductive health data or sexual health data.(3) A description of the purpose for the sale, including how the reproductive health data or sexual health data is gathered by the covered entity or processor and how the reproductive health data or sexual health data is used by the person purchasing the reproductive health data or sexual health data.(4) A statement that the provision of goods and services offered by the covered entity or processor is not conditioned on the consumer signing the consent.(5) A statement that the consumer, or an authorized representative of the consumer, may revoke the consent at any time and contain a description of how to submit a revocation of consent.(6) A statement that the reproductive health data or sexual health data sold in accordance with valid consent, obtained according to this subsection, is subject to redisclosure and 20260SB1350PN1777 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 valid for one transaction. A valid consent shall be required for each transaction.(7) The signature of the consumer providing consent and the date on which the consent was signed by the consumer.(8) An expiration date for the consent, which may expire no earlier than one year after the consumer's signature.(g) Consent is not valid if:(1) the expiration date of the consent has passed;(2) the consent does not contain all of the information required under subsection (f);(3) the consent has been revoked by the consumer;(4) the consent has been combined with a consent for other documents; and(5) the good or service is used in a manner contrary to what the consumer knows or should have known when the consumer provided consent.(h) A copy of the valid consent must be provided to the consumer by the covered entity or processor selling or offering to sell the reproductive health data or sexual health data.(i) A covered entity, processor or purchaser that sells, offers to sell or purchase reproductive health data or sexual health data shall retain a copy of the valid consent for not less than six years after the date that the consent is signed by the consumer or the date when the consent was last in effect, whichever is later.(j) A covered entity or processor that sells reproductive health data or sexual health data shall provide a clear and conspicuous method on the covered entity's or processor's publicly accessible Internet website that enables a consumer, or a person authorized by the consumer, to revoke the consumer's 20260SB1350PN1777 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consent to sell reproductive health data or sexual health data at any time.(k) A covered entity or processor selling a consumer's reproductive health data or sexual health data and the purchaser of the reproductive health data or sexual health data must enter into a written agreement governing the purchaser's processing of the consumer's reproductive health data and sexual health data. The written agreement shall:(1) State the nature and purpose of the sale, the type of reproductive health data or sexual health data subject to the sale, the duration of processing and the rights and obligations of the parties.(2) Require the purchaser to adhere to the requirements that a covered entity or service provider must adhere to this section.(3) Restrict how the purchaser may process the reproductive health data or sexual health data.(4) Require the purchaser to destroy, delete or return all reproductive health data and sexual health data to the covered entity or service provider at the end of the service or on revocation of consent by the consumer, unless retention of the reproductive health data or sexual health data is required by law.(l) A covered entity or processor may not implement a geofence around an entity that provides in-person reproductive health services if the geofence:(1) identifies or tracks a consumer seeking reproductive health services;(2) collects reproductive health data or sexual health data from the consumer; or20260SB1350PN1777 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) sends a notification, message or advertisement to the consumer related to the consumer's reproductive health data or sexual health data.(m) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to a covered entity or processor regarding protected health information under HIPAA and the regulations promulgated under HIPAA including 45 CFR Pts. 160 (relating to general administrative requirements) and 164 (relating to security and privacy).(n) As used in this section:"Collect" means to buy, rent, gather, obtain, receive or access reproductive health data or sexual health data about an individual in any manner, including, by receiving data from the individual, actively or passively or by tracking the individual's online activity."Consent" means, in a relation to an individual, an affirmative act signifying the individual's freely given, specific, informed and unambiguous agreement to allow the processing of personal data relating to the individual. The term includes a written statement including by electronic means. The term does not include:(1) Acceptance of terms of use without requiring the individual to read the terms of use.(2) Acceptance of a document that contains a general description of personal data processing along with additional unrelated information.(3) Acceptance of terms of use by hovering over, muting, pausing or closing a given piece of content or an agreement obtained through the use of dark patterns."Controller" means either of the following:20260SB1350PN1777 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association or other legal entity that meets the following criteria:(i) is organized or operated for the profit or financial benefit of shareholders or other owners;(ii) alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the processing of personal information of an individual;(iii) conducts business in this Commonwealth; and(iv) satisfies one of the following thresholds:(A) has annual gross revenues more than ten million dollars ($10,000,000);(B) annually buys, receives, sells or shares for commercial purposes, personal information of at least fifty thousand (50,000) consumers, households or devices;(C) derives at least fifty percent (50%) of annual revenues from the sale of personal data; or(2) an entity that controls or shares common branding with a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association or other legal entity that meets the criteria of clause (1)."Covered entity" means a public, private, operated for profit or not operated for profit business or organization that provides reproductive health care, placement or services and collects reproductive health data or sexual health data from an individual and operates in this Commonwealth. The term includes a business or organization that licenses or certifies the provision of reproductive health care, placement or services."Dark pattern" means a user interface designed or manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user 20260SB1350PN1777 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 autonomy, decision making or choice, including unfair methods of competition prohibited under 15 U.S.C. § 45 (relating to unfair methods of competition unlawful; prevention by Commission)."Geofence" means technology that uses global positioning coordinates, cell tower connectivity, cellular data, radio frequency identification, Wi-Fi data or any other form of spatial or location detection used to establish a virtual boundary around a specific physical location or to locate an individual within a virtual boundary of no more than one thousand eight hundred and fifty feet (1,850)."HIPAA" means the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 42 U.S.C. Ch. 7 Subch. XI Pt. C)."Neural data" means information obtained by neurotechnology. The term does not include data inferred from nonneural information."Neurotechnology" means a device capable of recording, interpreting or altering the response of an individual's central or peripheral nervous system to internal or external environment of the device."Personal data" means information related to an individual's physical or mental health status, healthcare provision or health outcomes. The term includes medical history, diagnoses, treatment plans, medications, laboratory test results and other health-related information that can identify an individual or provide insights into the health status of the individual."Process" or "processing" means an operation or set of operations performed, whether by manual or automated means, on personal data or on sets of reproductive health data or sexual health data, including the collection, use, storage, disclosure, 20260SB1350PN1777 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 analysis, deletion or modification of reproductive health data or sexual health data."Processor" means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity or other legal entity that collects, processes, retains, transfers or sells reproductive health data or sexual health data on behalf or direction of a covered entity."Reproductive health data" means as follows:(1) Information relating to the reproductive or sexual health data of an individual, including:(i) Efforts to research or obtain reproductive or sexual health information services or supplies, including location information unless the individual provides consent.(ii) Reproductive health conditions, status, diseases or diagnoses, including pregnancy, menstruation, ovulation, ability to conceive a pregnancy, whether an individual is sexually active or engages in unprotected sex.(iii) Reproductive and sexual-health-related surgeries and procedures, including termination of a pregnancy.(iv) Use or purchase of contraceptives, birth control or other medication related to reproductive health, including abortifacients.(v) Bodily functions, vital signs, measurements or symptoms related to menstruation or pregnancy, including basal temperature, cramps, bodily discharge or hormone levels.(vi) Information about diagnoses or diagnostic testing, treatments, medications or the use of any product or service relating to the matters described in subclauses (i), (ii), (iii), (iv) and (v).(vii) Neural data.20260SB1350PN1777 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) Information described in in this clause that is derived from non-health-related information such as proxy, derivative, inferred, emergent or algorithmic data.(2) The term does not include health information that is protected under HIPAA, health records for the purposes of 49 Pa. Code § 16.95 (relating to medical records) or patient-identifying records for the purposes of 42 U.S.C. § 290dd-2 (relating to confidentiality of records)."Reproductive health services" means a health care service or product that supports or relates to an individual's reproductive system, pregnancy status or sexual well-being, including:(1) Individual health conditions, status, diseases or diagnoses.(2) Social, psychological, behavioral and medical interventions.(3) Health-related surgeries or procedures, including abortions.(4) Bodily functions, vital signs, symptoms or measurements.(5) Diagnoses or diagnostic testing, treatment or medication.(6) Medical or nonmedical services related to and provided in conjunction with an abortion, including associated diagnostics, counseling, supplies and follow-up services."Sale of personal data" means as follows:(1) The exchange of personal data for monetary or other valuable consideration by a controller to a third party.(2) The term does not include the following:(i) The disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the personal data on behalf of a controller.(ii) The disclosure of personal data to a third party for 20260SB1350PN1777 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the purpose of providing a product or service requested by an individual.(iii) The disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of a controller.(iv) The disclosure of personal data when an individual directs a controller to disclose the individual's personal data or intentionally uses the controller to interact with a third party.(v) The disclosure of personal data that an individual intentionally:(A) made available to the general public via a channel of mass media; and(B) did not restrict to a specific audience.(vi) The disclosure or transfer of personal data from a controller to a third party as an asset that is part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or other transaction or a proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or other transaction, in which the third party assumes control of all or part of the controller's assets."Sexual health data" means information pertaining to an individual's sexual health, including sexual behavior, sexually transmitted infections, contraceptive use, sexual orientation and reproductive health. The term includes medical records, treatment histories and health surveys that analyze the individual's sexual well-being and access to sexual and reproductive health services."Third party" means a person, including Federal, State or local law enforcement or a Federal, State or local agency, other than a controller or processor or an affiliate of the processor or the controller.20260SB1350PN1777 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. This act shall take effect in one year.20260SB1350PN1777 - 14 - 1